Texas, session 891, SB48.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 1603.2308, Occupations Code, is amended by adding Subsection (b-1) to read as follows: (b-1)  The rules adopted under Subsection (b) must require students to receive instruction on identifying and assisting victims of domestic violence. SECTION 2.  Section 1603.3002, Occupations Code, is amended by adding Subsection (d) to read as follows: (d)  In addition to any continuing education requirements established under Subsection (a), the commission shall adopt rules requiring a license holder to complete continuing education on identifying and assisting victims of domestic violence. SECTION 3.  As soon as practicable after the effective date of this Act, the Texas Commission of Licensing and Regulation shall adopt rules to implement the changes in law made by this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.